Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2466.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-207, to read: START_STATUTE23-207. Employer requirements; employee breaks; overtime pay; fair labor standards act A. An employer shall provide an employee all of the following: 1. A thirty-minute UNPAID meal break when working more than five hours in a day and an additional thirty-minute unpaid meal break when working more than twelve hours in a day. 2. A paid ten-minute rest break for every four hours worked. 3. One and one-half times the employee's regular rate of pay for both of the following: (a) The hours worked of more than eight hours up to and including twelve hours in a WORKDAY. (b) The first eight hours worked on the seventh consecutive day of work in a workweek. 4. Double the employee's regular rate of pay for the hours worked of more than both of the following: (a) Twelve hours in a workday. (b) Eight hours on the seventh consecutive day of work in a workweek. B. Notwithstanding any other law, the fair labor standards act of 1938 (52 Stat. 1060; 29 United States Code sections 201 through 219) applies to employers whose annual sales total $100,000 or that engage in interstate commerce.END_STATUTE